Utah statutes.
53A-11-403.   Reporting procedure.

(1)  The principal of a public school affected by this chapter shall appoint one educator as the "designated educator" to make all reports required under Sections 53A-11-401 through 53A-11-404.

(2)  The designated educator, upon receiving a report of a prohibited act from an educator under Section 53A-11-402, shall immediately report the violation to the student's parent or legal guardian, and may report the violation to an appropriate law enforcement agency or official.

(3)  The designated educator may not disclose to the student or to the student's parent or legal guardian the identity of the educator who made the initial report.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

